District of Columbia statutes.
31-5710

Repealed

Payment of assessments and/or dues by beneficiary.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1314, ch. 854, § 758
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1210.
1973 Ed., § 35-910.